Utah statutes.
63M-1-2607 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Acceptance of initial proposal -- Obtaining detailed proposals.

(1)  If an initial proposal is accepted under Section 63M-1-2606, the chief procurement officer shall:

(a)  take action under Section 63G-6-408.5 to initiate a procurement process to obtain one or more detailed proposals using information from portions of the initial proposal that are not protected records under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records and Access Management Act;

(b)  consult with the committee during the procurement process; and

(c)  submit all detailed proposals that meet the guidelines established under Subsection 63M-1-2608(1), including the detailed proposal submitted by the private entity that submitted the initial proposal for the project, to:

(i)  the committee; and

(ii)  the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.

(2)  The office is considered the purchasing agency for a procurement process initiated under this part.

